Tennessee, session 114, SB0674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1802(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(e) Subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), and (g) do not apply with respect to employees
of a local government.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-1802, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(g) The general assembly preempts and occupies the entire field of regulating
the terms and conditions of employment. Unless expressly provided for by state law, a
local government and any agency, department, or official of a local government shall not
adopt or enforce an ordinance, resolution, rule, code, requirement, or policy that requires
a term or condition of employment that exceeds or conflicts with the law of this state or
federal law.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0674
002161
- 1 -